New York, session 2025-2026, A11023.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision (h) of section 7.09 of the mental hygiene law, 2 as added by chapter 301 of the laws of 1994 and relettered by section 2 3 of part I of chapter 58 of the laws of 2005, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 (h) The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to address 6 the language assistance services and communications needs of non-English 7 speaking individuals seeking or receiving services in facilities oper- 8 ated or licensed by the office in order to facilitate their access to 9 services. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited 10 to, documents, forms and materials being available in English and the 11 twelve most common non-English languages spoken by individuals in New 12 York state based on United States census data, and other reasonable 13 means to accommodate the language capabilities and preferences of non- 14 English speaking individuals in such facilities where a significant 15 number of non-English speaking individuals seek or receive services. 16 § 2. Subdivision (e) of section 13.09 of the mental hygiene law, as 17 added by chapter 301 of the laws of 1994, is amended to read as 18 follows: 19 (e) The commissioner shall promulgate rules and regulations to address 20 the language assistance services and communications needs of non-English 21 speaking individuals seeking or receiving services in facilities oper- 22 ated or licensed by the office in order to facilitate their access to 23 services. Such rules and regulations shall include, but not be limited 24 to, documents, forms, and materials being available in English and the 25 twelve most common non-English languages spoken by individuals in New 26 York state based on United States census data, and other reasonable EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15612-01-6 A. 11023 2 1 means to accommodate the language capabilities and preferences of non- 2 English speaking individuals in such facilities where a significant 3 number of non-English speaking individuals seek or receive services. 4 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately.